Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 39. Snowmobiles.

Administrative Code. —

For hunting from snowmobiles, see 5 AAC 92.080.

Collateral references. —

Accidents involving negligence in operation of snowmobile, skimobile, or similar vehicle, 42 ALR3d 1422.

Criminal liability based on violation of statute specifically regulating operation of snowmobile, 45 ALR3d 1438.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by defect in snowmobile or other recreational-purpose vehicle, 81 ALR3d 394; 66 ALR4th 622.

Sec. 28.39.010.
Snowmobile registration.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person may not operate a snowmobile within the state unless the snowmobile has been registered and numbered as required by this chapter. Registration under this subsection is not required for a snowmobile owned by the United States.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of an infraction and is subject to a $300 fine under AS

28.90.010(c)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (b) of this section, “AS

28.90.010(c)

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.050

(c)” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.050

.

Sec. 28.39.020.
Authority of department; registration agents; registration applications.

The department is authorized to assign identification numbers and register snowmobiles.

The department shall authorize agents, including snowmobile dealers, to register snowmobiles. The department may authorize a snowmobile dealer authorized as an agent for snowmobile registration to issue temporary and permanent registrations, and to renew registrations.

A snowmobile dealer shall require a purchaser of a new or used snowmobile sold at retail to complete a registration application and pay the registration fee before the snowmobile leaves the dealer’s premises unless the snowmobile is exempt from registration or a registration fee under this chapter.

In a manner set out in this chapter and as may be prescribed by the department, an authorized agent shall accept a registration application and registration fee, issue a registration, and forward the application and registration fee to the department.

The original and each renewal registration fee for a snowmobile is as provided under AS

28.10.421

, except that the fee shall be multiplied by two for a four-year registration and multiplied by three for a six-year registration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Sec. 28.39.030.
Proof of ownership for registration purposes.

The department may require proof of ownership of the snowmobile before registering a snowmobile under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)

Sec. 28.39.040.
Issuance of a certificate of registration and decals; inspection of registration; expiration of registration.

Upon receipt of a completed application for registration of a snowmobile, the department shall record the registration of the snowmobile under a number assigned to the snowmobile by the department. A number assigned to a snowmobile at the time of the original registration must remain with the snowmobile until the snowmobile is destroyed, abandoned, or permanently removed from the state or until the registration number is changed or terminated by the department.

The department shall issue a registration without the payment of a fee if the snowmobile is owned by a state agency, a political subdivision of the state, or another state. The department may, upon request, issue a registration without the payment of a fee if the snowmobile is owned by the United States.

The department shall, upon assignment of a registration number, issue and deliver to the owner a certificate of registration in a form prescribed by the department. A certificate of registration is not valid unless it is signed by the person who signed the application for registration.

At the issuance of the original certificate of registration and upon renewal, the department shall issue to the registrant a validation decal indicating the validity of the current registration and the expiration date. A validation decal must be affixed to the snowmobile in the manner prescribed by the department. A snowmobile is not validly registered under this chapter unless a validation decal and current registration have been issued as required by this section.

A snowmobile shall display the registration number assigned to it at all times in the manner prescribed by the department.

While operating a snowmobile that is required to be registered under this chapter, a person shall have in possession or carry in the snowmobile a valid registration. Upon demand by a peace officer authorized to enforce this chapter, a person operating a snowmobile shall produce for inspection the certificate of registration for the snowmobile and furnish to the peace officer any information necessary for the identification of the snowmobile and its owner.

A snowmobile owner holding a certificate of registration shall notify the department in writing of a change of residence within 15 days after the change occurs.

A snowmobile may be registered for two, four, or six years. A snowmobile registration expires at the end of the last season for which it is issued. An application for renewal of registration for the succeeding years must be made at a time and in a form prescribed by the department.

The department may issue a replacement certificate of registration if the owner demonstrates to the department that the original certificate has been lost, mutilated, or destroyed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)

Sec. 28.39.050.
Change of ownership; used snowmobiles held for resale; termination of use.

If there is a change of ownership of a snowmobile, the seller and buyer shall fill out the transfer of ownership section of the registration, and the seller shall sign over the registration to the new owner. The seller shall promptly submit the transfer of ownership section to the department, and the department shall issue a new certificate of registration to the new owner.

This chapter does not require a snowmobile dealer to renew the registration of a used snowmobile held solely for purposes of resale until the snowmobile is resold.

An owner of a snowmobile registered under this chapter shall notify the department in writing of the termination of use, destruction, or permanent removal of the snowmobile from the state within 15 days after the termination of use, destruction, or removal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)

Sec. 28.39.060.
Regulations authorized.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the registration of snowmobiles and display of registration numbers on snowmobiles as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Sec. 28.39.250.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“dealer” means a person engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles predominantly for purposes other than resale;

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“operate” means to ride in or on and control the operation of a snowmobile;

“operator” means a person who operates or is in actual physical control of a snowmobile;

“owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having title to a snowmobile and who is entitled to the use or possession of the snowmobile;

“possession” means physical custody of a snowmobile by an owner of a snowmobile or by an owner of a motor vehicle or trailer on or in which a snowmobile is placed for the purpose of transport;

“retail” means the sale of a snowmobile for any purpose other than resale;

“season” means one calendar year beginning October 1 and ending September 30;

“snowmobile” means a self-propelled vehicle primarily designed or altered for travel on snow or ice when supported in part by skis, belts, or cleats; “snowmobile” does not include machinery used strictly for the grooming of snowmobile trails or ski slopes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1998)